Illinois, session 104th, SB3070.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-605 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-605)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-22)7    Sec. 27-605. Required high school courses. 8    (a) (Blank). 9    (b) (Blank).10    (c) (Blank).11    (d) (Blank).12    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 13to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 149th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 15successfully complete all of the following courses:16        (1) Four years of language arts.17        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 18    which must be English and the other of which may be English 19    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 20    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 21    graduation requirements. 22        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 23    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and   SB3070 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 2    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 3    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 4    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 5    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 6    path.7        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 8    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 9    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 10    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 11    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 12    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 13        (4) Two years of science.14        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 15    year must be history of the United States or a combination 16    of history of the United States and American government 17    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 18    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 19    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 20    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 21    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 22    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 23    content shall focus on government institutions, the 24    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 25    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 26    School districts may utilize private funding available for   SB3070 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 2    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 3    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a 4    financial literacy course.5        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 6    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 7    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 8    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 9    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 10    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 11    requirement under this subdivision (6). 12    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 13prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 14entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 15requirements, successfully complete all of the following 16courses: 17        (1) Four years of language arts.18        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 19    which must be English and the other of which may be English 20    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 21    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 22    graduation requirements.23        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 24    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 25    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 26    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry   SB3070 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 2    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 3    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 4    path.5        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 6    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 7    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 8    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 9    requirements. 10        (4) Two years of laboratory science.11        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 12    year must be history of the United States or a combination 13    of history of the United States and American government 14    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 15    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 16    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 17    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 18    Civics course content shall focus on government 19    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 20    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 21    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 22    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 23    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 24    include a financial literacy course.25        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 26    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include   SB3070 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1    American Sign Language, (D) career and technical 2    education, or (E) forensic speech (speech and debate). A 3    forensic speech course used to satisfy the course 4    requirement under subdivision (1) may not be used to 5    satisfy the course requirement under this subdivision (6). 6    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 7prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 8entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 9requirements, successfully complete either (i) 2 years of 10foreign language courses, which may include American Sign 11Language, or (ii) at least 2 years of coursework that has been 12authorized by the State Board of Education as meeting the 13requirements for an approved career and technical education 14course. A pupil who satisfies either course requirement under 15this subsection (e-10) is deemed to have satisfied . A pupil 16may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy the 17course requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5).18    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 19school districts of standards for writing-intensive 20coursework. 21    (f-5) If a school district offers an Advanced Placement 22computer science course to high school students, then the 23school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 24high school mathematics course and must denote on the 25student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 26science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative   SB3070 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 2subsection (e) of this Section. 3    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 4the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 5or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 6determined by an individualized education program. 7    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 89th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 9or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 10determined by an individualized education program. 11    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 12pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 13prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 14course of study is determined by an individualized education 15program. 16    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 17grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 18students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 19by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 20not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 21school year or a prior school year or to students with 22disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 23individualized education program. 24    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 25provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-610 of this Code and the 26Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act.   SB3070 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18781 LNS 32224 b1    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 2the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 3grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 4to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 5Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 6(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 8-2-24; 7104-387, eff. 8-15-25; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25; revised 89-24-25.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.